Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB14.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each school district may implement a
wearable panic alert system at each school facility.
(2) As used in this section "wearable panic alert system" means a silent security
system by which the user manually activates a device that sends a nonaudible
signal to the local 911 public safety answering point and emergency responder
agencies that indicates a school security emergency that requires immediate
response and assistance from the public safety answering point.
(3) The wearable panic alert system shall:
(a) Connect emergency service technologies to ensure real-time coordination
among multiple emergency responder agencies;
(b) Integrate with public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 911
calls and mobile activations; and
(c) Be capable of initiating a campuswide lockdown notification.
(4) The department shall provide a list of approved wearable panic alert systems. At a
minimum, an approved system shall:
(a) Alert designated school personnel by smartphone application, phone call,
text message, or other technology when an emergency response is initiated
on-site using the mobile panic alert system;
(b) Provide emergency responders with the location and movements of the
activator of the wearable panic alert system in order to assist first
responders during an emergency;
(c) Integrate designated school personnel with emergency responders to
provide real-time situational updates during an emergency; and
Page 1 of 3
HB001410.100 - 277 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 14/GA
(d) Be capable of ingesting data from panic button activations, school safety
camera and video data, and other real-time school safety data sources on a
single interface.
(5) A school district that procures a wearable panic alert system shall:
(a) Ensure, before the school year begins, all school building personnel receive
training on the protocol and appropriate use of the panic alert device
described in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Ensure all security data, including but not limited to cameras, maps, and
access control within a school building, are accessible by local law
enforcement agencies;
(c) Coordinate with all local law enforcement agencies to establish appropriate
access protocols; and
(d) Provide each staff person with a wearable panic alert system device that
allows for immediate contact with local emergency response agencies.
(6) (a) The Center for School Safety shall establish a Wearable Panic Alert Grant
Program for school districts.
(b) The program shall provide a fifty percent (50%) match to school districts for
the implementation of a wearable panic alert system or for maintenance
costs associated with a wearable panic alert system, if funds are available.
Section 2. KRS 158.446 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Of the funds appropriated to support the school safety fund program in the biennial
budget, no more than[twenty percent (20%) of the funds in 1998-99, and] ten
percent (10%) [in 1999-2000, ]shall be used for the operation of the Center for
School Safety.
(2) The Center for School Safety may distribute wearable panic alert grants in
accordance with subsection (6) of Section 1 of this Act using funds appropriated
to support the school safety fund program in the biennial budget[ and grants to be
Page 2 of 3
HB001410.100 - 277 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 14/GA
distributed by the Center to support exemplary programs in local school districts].
(3) The remainder of the appropriation shall be distributed to local school districts on a
per pupil basis. The funds shall be used for the purpose of improving school safety
and student discipline through alternative education programs and intervention
services in compliance with KRS 158.148, 158.150, and 158.445.
(4) School districts shall be responsible for documenting the purposes for which these
funds were expended.
Section 3. This Act may be cited as Alyssa's Law.
Page 3 of 3
HB001410.100 - 277 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:56 PM GA